Utah statutes.
53-3-607.   Court and agency reporting of actions to department.

Any court or other agency of this state, or a subdivision of the state that has jurisdiction to take any action suspending, revoking, or otherwise limiting a license to drive, shall report any action suspending, revoking, or limiting a license to drive and the adjudication upon which it is based, to the department within ten days, in a manner specified by the department.

